Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2859
Temporary educational permit; period valid; renewal.

The duration of any temporary educational permit issued pursuant to the Pharmacy Practice Act shall be determined by the department but in no case shall it be in excess of one year. The permit may be renewed from time to time at the discretion of the department but in no case shall it be renewed for more than five one-year periods.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 461;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.26;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 346;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 955.